Utah statutes.
26-8a-202.   Emergency medical communications.

Consistent with federal law, the department is the lead agency for coordinating the statewide emergency medical service communication systems under which emergency medical personnel, dispatch centers, and treatment facilities provide medical control and coordination between emergency medical service providers.



Enacted by Chapter 141, 1999 General Session

